California statutes. Public Resources Code
(a) Any person who is aggrieved by any action taken by a local government or other local agency in implementing the resource management plan, or otherwise taken pursuant to this division, may file an appeal with the commission. The ground for an appeal and the commission consideration of an appeal shall be that an action, as to land located exclusively within the primary zone, is inconsistent with the resource management plan, the approved portions of local government general plans that implement the resource management plan, or this division. The appeal shall be heard by the commission within 60 days from the date of the filing of the appeal, unless the commission, either itself or by delegation to the executive director, determines that the issue raised on appeal is not within the commission’s jurisdiction or does not raise an appealable issue.

(b) In the absence of an appeal by an aggrieved person, the commission may decide by majority vote to review on appeal any action taken by a local government or other local agency in implementing the resource management plan, or otherwise taken pursuant to this division, for land located exclusively within the primary zone, if the commission believes the action may be inconsistent with the resource management plan, or this division.

(c) The commission shall, by regulation, adopt administrative procedures governing those appeals.

(d) The commission may comment on projects within the secondary zone that impact the primary zone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 547, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

29771.

After a hearing on an appealed action pursuant to Section 29770, the commission shall either deny the appeal or remand the matter to the local government or local agency for reconsideration, after making specific findings. Upon remand, the local government or local agency shall modify the appealed action and resubmit the matter for review to the commission. A proposed action appealed pursuant to this section shall not be effective until the commission has adopted written findings, based on substantial evidence in the record, that the action is consistent with the resources management plan, the approved portions of local government general plans that implement the resources management plan, and this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 32.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

29772.

An aggrieved person may seek judicial review of any action taken by the commission in adopting the resource management plan or any action taken by a local government or other local agency that is appealable pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 29770, by filing a petition for writ of mandate in accordance with Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure within 60 days from the date that the commission action was taken or, if appealed to the commission, within 60 days from the final decision of the commission on the appeal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 584, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

29773.

(a) The commission may review and provide comments and recommendations to the Delta Stewardship Council on any significant project or proposed project within the scope of the Delta Plan, including, but not limited to, actions by state and federal agencies, that may affect the unique cultural, recreational, and agricultural values within the primary and secondary zones. Review and comment authority granted to the commission shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Identification of impacts to the cultural, recreational, and agricultural values of the Delta.

(2) Recommendations for actions that may avoid, reduce, or
 mitigate impacts to the cultural, recreational, and agricultural values of the Delta.

(3) Review of consistency of the project or proposed project with the resources management plan and the Delta Plan.

(4) Identification and recommendation of methods to address Delta community concerns regarding large-scale habitat plan development and implementation.

(b) The council shall take into consideration the recommendations of the commission, including the recommendations included in the economic sustainability plan. If the council, in its discretion, determines that a recommendation of the commission is feasible and consistent with the objectives of the Delta Plan and the purposes of this division, the council shall adopt the recommendation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 33.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Financial Provisions [29776. - 29778.5.]

29776.

The Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Protection Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. Any money in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Protection Fund is available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for support of the commission in an amount not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in any fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 568, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

29777.

The commission shall not incur costs in excess of the amount of funds available for expenditure by the commission in any fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 286, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

29778.5.

The Delta Investment Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. Any funds within the Delta Investment Fund shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the commission for the implementation of the regional economic sustainability plan, developed pursuant to Section 29759, for the purposes of enhancing Delta communities. The Delta Investment Fund may receive funds from federal, state, local, and private sources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 35.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Annual Report [29780. - 29780.]

29780.

On January 1 of each year, the commission shall submit to the Governor and the Legislature a report describing the progress that has been made in achieving the objectives of this division. The report shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) An evaluation of the effectiveness of the commission in undertaking its functions prescribed in this division, including, but not limited to, its mandates as follows:

(1) Determining the consistency of local general plans with the Delta Plan.

(2) Outcomes of appealed local land use decisions pursuant to Sections
 29770 and 29771.

(3) Outcomes of reviews initiated by the commission.

(4) Facilitating regional economic sustainability.

(5) Supporting other regional activities for the enhancement of Delta communities.

(b) An update of the economic sustainability plan, using baseline conditions set forth in the original economic sustainability plan.

(c) The status of the environmental thresholds established by the commission in the original resource management plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 36.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 20. CALIFORNIA COASTAL ACT [30000. - 30900.]



CHAPTER 1. Findings and Declarations and General Provisions [30000. - 30013.]

30000.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the California Coastal Act of 1976.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30001.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares:

(a) That the California coastal zone is a distinct and valuable natural resource of vital and enduring interest to all the people and exists as a delicately balanced ecosystem.

(b) That the permanent protection of the state’s natural and scenic resources is a paramount concern to present and future residents of the state and nation. 

(c) That to promote the public safety, health, and welfare, and to protect public and private property, wildlife, marine fisheries, and other ocean resources, and the natural environment, it is necessary to protect the ecological balance of the coastal zone and prevent its deterioration and destruction.

(d) That existing developed uses, and future developments that are carefully planned and developed consistent with the policies of this division, are essential to the economic and social well-being of the people of this state and especially to working persons employed within the coastal zone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1090.)
-------------------------------------------

30001.2.

The Legislature further finds and declares that, notwithstanding the fact electrical generating facilities, refineries, and coastal-dependent developments, including ports and commercial fishing facilities, offshore petroleum and gas development, and liquefied natural gas facilities, may have significant adverse effects on coastal resources or coastal access, it may be necessary to locate such developments in the coastal zone in order to ensure that inland as well as coastal resources are preserved and that orderly economic development proceeds within the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30001.3.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Offshore wind energy generation is an important component of California’s renewable energy portfolio.

(b) While offshore wind energy generation can provide significant climate and economic benefits, industrial scale development and deployment of offshore wind energy will also have impacts on coastal and ocean resources, fisheries, and coastal communities that are not yet fully understood.

(c) The urgency of the climate crisis and the importance of ocean health to maintaining a livable planet necessitate the expeditious development of offshore wind energy generation facilities
 and associated infrastructure in a manner that also avoids, minimizes, and mitigates impacts to ocean and coastal resources to the maximum extent practicable.

(d) Through science-based monitoring and mitigation, meaningful engagement with affected communities, adaptive management, and equitable workforce development, California can be a world leader in the rapid, just, and environmentally sustainable generation of renewable energy from offshore wind.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 386, Sec. 2.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

30001.5.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the basic goals of the state for the coastal zone are to:

(a) Protect, maintain, and, where feasible, enhance and restore the overall quality of the coastal zone environment and its natural and artificial resources.

(b) Ensure orderly, balanced utilization and conservation of coastal zone resources taking into account the social and economic needs of the people of the state.

(c) Maximize public access to and along the coast and maximize public recreational opportunities in the coastal zone consistent with
 sound resources conservation principles and constitutionally protected rights of private property owners.

(d) Ensure priority for coastal-dependent and coastal-related development over other development on the coast.

(e) Encourage state and local initiatives and cooperation in preparing procedures to implement coordinated planning and development for mutually beneficial uses, including educational uses, in the coastal zone.

(f) Anticipate, assess, plan for, and, to the extent feasible, avoid, minimize, and mitigate the adverse environmental and
 economic effects of sea level rise within the coastal zone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 236, Sec. 1.   (SB 1)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

30002.

The Legislature further finds and declares that:

(a) The California Coastal Zone Conservation Commission, pursuant to the California Coastal Zone Conservation Act of 1972 (commencing with Section 27000), has made a detailed study of the coastal zone; that there has been extensive participation by other governmental agencies, private interests, and the general public in the study; and that, based on the study, the commission has prepared a plan for the orderly, long-range conservation, use, and management of the natural, scenic, cultural, recreational, and manmade resources of the coastal zone.

(b) Such plan contains a series of recommendations which require implementation by the Legislature and that some of those recommendations are appropriate for immediate implementation as provided for in this division while others require additional review.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30003.

All public agencies and all federal agencies, to the extent possible under federal law or regulations or the United States Constitution, shall comply with the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30004.

The Legislature further finds and declares that:

(a) To achieve maximum responsiveness to local conditions, accountability, and public accessibility, it is necessary to rely heavily on local government and local land use planning procedures and enforcement.

(b) To ensure conformity with the provisions of this division, and to provide maximum state involvement in federal activities allowable under federal law or regulations or the United States Constitution which affect California’s coastal resources, to protect regional, state, and national interests in assuring the maintenance of the long-term productivity and economic vitality of coastal resources necessary for the well-being of the people of the state, and to avoid long-term costs to the public and a diminished quality of life resulting from the misuse of coastal resources, to coordinate and integrate the activities of the many agencies whose activities impact the coastal zone, and to supplement their activities in matters not properly within the jurisdiction of any existing agency, it is necessary to provide for continued state coastal planning and management through a state coastal commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30005.

No provision of this division is a limitation on any of the following:

(a) Except as otherwise limited by state law, on the power of a city or county or city and county to adopt and enforce additional regulations, not in conflict with this act, imposing further conditions, restrictions, or limitations with respect to any land or water use or other activity which might adversely affect the resources of the coastal zone.

(b) On the power of any city or county or city and county to declare, prohibit, and abate nuisances.

(c) On the power of the Attorney General to bring an action in the name of the people of the state to enjoin any waste or pollution of the resources of the coastal zone or any nuisance.

(d) On the right of any person to maintain an appropriate action for relief against a private nuisance or for any other private relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30005.5.

Nothing in this division shall be construed to authorize any local government, or to authorize the commission to require any local government, to exercise any power it does not already have under the Constitution and laws of this state or that is not specifically delegated pursuant to Section 30519.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 744.)
-------------------------------------------

30006.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the public has a right to fully participate in decisions affecting coastal planning, conservation, and development; that achievement of sound coastal conservation and development is dependent upon public understanding and support; and that the continuing planning and implementation of programs for coastal conservation and development should include the widest opportunity for public participation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30006.5.

The Legislature further finds and declares that sound and timely scientific recommendations are necessary for many coastal planning, conservation, and development decisions and that the commission should, in addition to developing its own expertise in significant applicable fields of science, interact with members of the scientific and academic communities in the social, physical, and natural sciences so that the commission may receive technical advice and recommendations with regard to its decisionmaking, especially with regard to issues such as coastal erosion and geology, agriculture, marine biodiversity, wetland restoration, sea level rise, offshore wind development, desalination plants, and the cumulative impact of coastal zone developments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 292, Sec. 1.   (SB 704)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

30007.

Nothing in this division shall exempt local governments from meeting the requirements of state and federal law with respect to providing low- and moderate-income housing, replacement housing, relocation benefits, or any other obligation related to housing imposed by existing law or any law hereafter enacted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30007.5.

The Legislature further finds and recognizes that conflicts may occur between one or more policies of the division. The Legislature therefore declares that in carrying out the provisions of this division such conflicts be resolved in a manner which on balance is the most protective of significant coastal resources. In this context, the Legislature declares that broader policies which, for example, serve to concentrate development in close proximity to urban and employment centers may be more protective, overall, than specific wildlife habitat and other similar resource policies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30008.

This division shall constitute California’s coastal zone management program within the coastal zone for purposes of the Federal Coastal Zone Management Act of 1972 (16 U.S.C. 1451, et seq.) and any other federal act heretofore or hereafter enacted or amended that relates to the planning or management of coastal zone resources; provided, however, that within federal lands excluded from the coastal zone pursuant to the Federal Coastal Zone Management Act of 1972, the State of California shall, consistent with applicable federal and state laws, continue to exercise the full range of powers, rights, and privileges it now possesses or which may be granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1075.)
-------------------------------------------

30009.

This division shall be liberally construed to accomplish its purposes and objectives.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30010.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that this division is not intended, and shall not be construed as authorizing the commission, port governing body, or local government acting pursuant to this division to exercise their power to grant or deny a permit in a manner which will take or damage private property for public use, without the payment of just compensation therefor. This section is not intended to increase or decrease the rights of any owner of property under the Constitution of the State of California or the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 285, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

30011.

Nothing in this division shall authorize the commission to review a local government’s application of the requirements of Section 65590 of the Government Code to any development. In addition, the commission shall not require any applicant for a coastal development permit or any local government to provide certification or other evidence of compliance with the requirements of Section 65590 of the Government Code. The commission may, however, solely in connection with coastal development permit applications described in subdivision (c) of Section 30600.1, require information about the status of a local government’s action to apply the requirements of Section 65590 of the Government Code. This information shall be used for the purpose of determining time limits for commission action on these applications as provided in that subdivision (c).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 43, Sec. 5.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

30012.

(a) The Legislature finds that an educated and informed citizenry is essential to the well-being of a participatory democracy and is necessary to protect California’s finite natural resources, including the quality of its environment. The Legislature further finds that through education, individuals can be made aware of and encouraged to accept their share of the responsibility for protecting and improving the natural environment. 

(b) (1) The commission shall, to the extent that its resources permit, carry out a public education program that includes outreach efforts to schools, youth organizations, and the general public for the purpose of promoting understanding of, fostering a sense of individual responsibility for, and encouraging public initiatives and participation in programs for, the conservation and wise use of coastal and ocean resources. Emphasis shall be given to volunteer efforts such as the Adopt-A-Beach program. 

(2) In carrying out this program, the commission shall coordinate with other agencies to avoid duplication and to maximize information sharing.

(c) The commission is encouraged to seek funding from any appropriate public or private source and may apply for and expend any grant or endowment funds for the purposes of this section without the need to specifically include funds in its budget. Any funding made available to the commission for these purposes shall be reported to the fiscal committee of each house of the Legislature at the time its budget is being formally reviewed. 

(d) The commission is encouraged to seek and utilize interns for the purpose of assisting its regular staff in carrying out the purposes of this section and this division and, notwithstanding any other provision of law, may participate in any internship program the executive director determines to be appropriate. With respect to any internship program the commission uses, it shall make the best efforts to ensure that the participants in the program reflect the ethnic diversity of the state and are provided an educational and meaningful experience. 

(e) The commission shall submit to each house of the Legislature an annual report describing the progress it is making in carrying out this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 802, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

30013.

The Legislature further finds and declares that in order to advance the principles of environmental justice and equality, subdivision (a) of Section 11135 of the Government Code and subdivision (e) of Section 65040.12 of the Government Code apply to the commission and all public agencies implementing the provisions of this division. As required by Section 11135 of the Government Code, no person in the State of California, on the basis of race, national origin, ethnic group identification, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, color, genetic information, or disability, shall be unlawfully denied full and equal access to the benefits of, or be unlawfully subjected to discrimination, under any program or activity that is conducted, operated, or administered pursuant to this division, is
 funded directly by the state for purposes of this division, or receives any financial assistance from the state pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 578, Sec. 1.   (AB 2616)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Definitions [30100. - 30122.]

30100.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the interpretation of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30100.2.

“Aquaculture” means a form of agriculture as defined in Section 17 of the Fish and Game Code. Aquaculture products are agricultural products, and aquaculture facilities and land uses shall be treated as agricultural facilities and land uses in all planning and permit-issuing decisions governed by this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 131, Sec. 30.   Effective June 27, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

30100.5.

“Coastal county” means a county or city and county which lies, in whole or in part, within the coastal zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30101.

“Coastal-dependent development or use” means any development or use which requires a site on, or adjacent to, the sea to be able to function at all.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30101.3.

“Coastal-related development” means any use that is dependent on a coastal-dependent development or use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1090.)
-------------------------------------------

30101.5.

“Coastal development permit” means a permit for any development within the coastal zone that is required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30600.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30102.

“Coastal plan” means the California Coastal Zone Conservation Plan prepared and adopted by the California Coastal Zone Conservation Commission and submitted to the Governor and the Legislature on December 1, 1975, pursuant to the California Coastal Zone Conservation Act of 1972 (commencing with Section 27000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30103.

(a) “Coastal zone” means that land and water area of the State of California from the Oregon border to the border of the Republic of Mexico, specified on the maps identified and set forth in Section 17 of Chapter 1330 of the Statutes of 1976, extending seaward to the state’s outer limit of jurisdiction, including all offshore islands, and extending inland generally 1,000 yards from the mean high tide line of the sea. In significant coastal estuarine, habitat, and recreational areas it extends inland to the first major ridgeline paralleling the sea or five miles from the mean high tide line of the sea, whichever is less, and in developed urban areas the zone generally extends inland less than 1,000 yards. The coastal zone does not include the area
 of jurisdiction of the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, established pursuant to Title 7.2 (commencing with Section 66600) of the Government Code, nor any area contiguous thereto, including any river, stream, tributary, creek, or flood control or drainage channel flowing into such area.

(b) The commission shall, within 60 days after its first meeting, prepare and adopt a detailed map, on a scale of one inch equals 24,000 inches for the coastal zone and shall file a copy of the map with the county clerk of each coastal county. The purpose of this provision is to provide greater detail than is provided by the maps identified in Section 17 of Chapter 1330 of the Statutes of 1976. The commission may adjust the inland boundary of the coastal zone the minimum landward distance necessary up to a maximum of 100 yards except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, or the minimum distance seaward necessary up to a maximum of
 200 yards, to avoid bisecting any single lot or parcel or to conform it to readily identifiable natural or manmade features. Where a landward adjustment is requested by the local government and agreed to by the property owner, the maximum distance shall be 200 yards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 434.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

30105.

(a) “Commission” means the California Coastal Commission. Whenever the term California Coastal Zone Conservation Commission appears in any law, it means the California Coastal Commission.

(b) “Regional commission” means any regional coastal commission. Whenever the term regional coastal zone conservation commission appears in any law, it means the regional coastal commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30105.5.

“Cumulatively” or “cumulative effect” means the incremental effects of an individual project shall be reviewed in connection with the effects of past projects, the effects of other current projects, and the effects of probable future projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1087, Sec. 1.   Effective September 26, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

30106.

“Development” means, on land, in or under water, the placement or erection of any solid material or structure; discharge or disposal of any dredged material or of any gaseous, liquid, solid, or thermal waste; grading, removing, dredging, mining, or extraction of any materials; change in the density or intensity of use of land, including, but not limited to, subdivision pursuant to the Subdivision Map Act (commencing with Section 66410 of the Government Code), and any other division of land, including lot splits, except where the land division is brought about in connection with the purchase of such land by a public agency for public recreational use; change in the intensity of use of water, or of access thereto; construction, reconstruction, demolition, or alteration of the size of any structure, including any facility of any private, public, or municipal utility; and the removal or harvesting of major vegetation other than for agricultural purposes, kelp harvesting, and timber operations which are in accordance with a timber harvesting plan submitted pursuant to the provisions of the Z'berg-Nejedly Forest Practice Act of 1973 (commencing with Section 4511).

As used in this section, “structure” includes, but is not limited to, any building, road, pipe, flume, conduit, siphon, aqueduct, telephone line, and electrical power transmission and distribution line.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30107.

“Energy facility” means any public or private processing, producing, generating, storing, transmitting, or recovering facility for electricity, natural gas, petroleum, coal, or other source of energy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30107.3.

(a) “Environmental justice” means the fair treatment and meaningful involvement of people of all races, cultures, incomes, and national origins, with respect to the development, adoption, implementation, and enforcement of environmental laws, regulations, and policies.

(b) “Environmental justice” includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The availability of a healthy environment for all people.

(2) The deterrence, reduction, and elimination of pollution burdens for populations and communities experiencing the adverse effects of that pollution, so that the effects of the pollution are not disproportionately borne by those populations and communities.

(3) Governmental entities engaging and providing technical assistance to populations and communities most impacted by pollution to promote their meaningful participation in all phases of the environmental and land use decisionmaking process.

(4) At a minimum, the meaningful consideration of recommendations from populations and communities most
 impacted by pollution into environmental and land use decisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 360, Sec. 4.   (AB 1628)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

30107.5.

“Environmentally sensitive area” means any area in which plant or animal life or their habitats are either rare or especially valuable because of their special nature or role in an ecosystem and which could be easily disturbed or degraded by human activities and developments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1331.)
-------------------------------------------

30108.

“Feasible” means capable of being accomplished in a successful manner within a reasonable period of time, taking into account economic, environmental, social, and technological factors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30108.2.

“Fill” means earth or any other substance or material, including pilings placed for the purposes of erecting structures thereon, placed in a submerged area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30108.4.

“Implementing actions” means the ordinances, regulations, or programs which implement either the provisions of the certified local coastal program or the policies of this division and which are submitted pursuant to Section 30502.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30108.5.

“Land use plan” means the relevant portions of a local government’s general plan, or local coastal element which are sufficiently detailed to indicate the kinds, location, and intensity of land uses, the applicable resource protection and development policies and, where necessary, a listing of implementing actions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1331.)
-------------------------------------------

30108.55.

“Local coastal element” is that portion of a general plan applicable to the coastal zone which may be prepared by local government pursuant to this division, or any additional elements of the local government’s general plan prepared pursuant to Section 65303 of the Government Code, as the local government deems appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1009, Sec. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

30108.6.

“Local coastal program” means a local government’s (a) land use plans, (b) zoning ordinances, (c) zoning district maps, and (d) within sensitive coastal resources areas, other implementing actions, which, when taken together, meet the requirements of, and implement the provisions and policies of, this division at the local level.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------

30109.

“Local government” means any chartered or general law city, chartered or general law county, or any city and county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30110.

“Permit” means any license, certificate, approval, or other entitlement for use granted or denied by any public agency which is subject to the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30111.

“Person” means any individual, organization, partnership, limited liability company, or other business association or corporation, including any utility, and any federal, state, local government, or special district or an agency thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 217.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

30112.

“Port governing body” means the Board of Harbor Commissioners or Board of Port Commissioners which has authority over the Ports of Hueneme, Long Beach, Los Angeles, and San Diego Unified Port District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30113.

“Prime agricultural land” means those lands defined in paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 51201 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 43, Sec. 5.1.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

30114.

“Public works” means the following:

(a) All production, storage, transmission, and recovery facilities for water, sewerage, telephone, and other similar utilities owned or operated by any public agency or by any utility subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission, except for energy facilities.

(b) All public transportation facilities, including streets, roads, highways, public parking lots and structures, ports, harbors, airports, railroads, and mass transit facilities and stations, bridges, trolley wires, and other related facilities. For purposes of this division, neither the Ports of Hueneme, Long Beach, Los Angeles, nor San Diego Unified Port District nor any of the developments within these ports shall be considered public works.

(c) All publicly financed recreational facilities, all projects of the State Coastal Conservancy, and any development by a special district.

(d) All community college facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 392, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

30114.5.

“Residential development project” means a multifamily housing project that consists exclusively of residential uses and includes four or more units.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 22, Sec. 62.   (AB 130)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

30115.

“Sea” means the Pacific Ocean and all harbors, bays, channels, estuaries, salt marshes, sloughs, and other areas subject to tidal action through any connection with the Pacific Ocean, excluding nonestuarine rivers, streams, tributaries, creeks, and flood control and drainage channels. “Sea” does not include the area of jurisdiction of the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, established pursuant to Title 7.2 (commencing with Section 66600) of the Government Code, including any river, stream, tributary, creek, or flood control or drainage channel flowing directly or indirectly into such area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1331.)
-------------------------------------------

30116.

“Sensitive coastal resource areas” means those identifiable and geographically bounded land and water areas within the coastal zone of vital interest and sensitivity. “Sensitive coastal resource areas” include the following:

(a) Special marine and land habitat areas, wetlands, lagoons, and estuaries as mapped and designated in Part 4 of the coastal plan.

(b) Areas possessing significant recreational value.

(c) Highly scenic areas.

(d) Archaeological sites referenced in the California Coastline and Recreation Plan or as designated by the State Historic Preservation Officer.

(e) Special communities or neighborhoods which are significant visitor destination areas.

(f) Areas that provide existing coastal housing or recreational opportunities for low- and moderate-income persons.

(g) Areas where divisions of land could substantially impair or restrict coastal access.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30118.
